src-fst-affixes-verbs.lexc.md
Ojibwe verb morphology                           


The verbs are analysed as follows:
* We split the Verb lexicon in 4 groups according to transitivity class
* For each group, we add the prefixes, and mark them with *flag diacritics* (the @ symbols)
* Then come the stems themselves
* Finally, come the suffixes, including flag diacritics
to ensure that the correct prefixes and suffixes are matched together

Prefixes and suffixes are in affixes/verbs.lexc, whereas
the stems are in stems/verbs.lexc


The Ojibwe verbs are divided in four groups:

1. IA: Intransitive animate
1. II: Intransitive inanimate
1. TA: Transitive animate
1. TI: Transitive inanimate


# The prefixes


LEXICON Verb  divides the verbs in four transitivity classes



Intransitive animate

LEXICON IA    divides in independent, subjunctive and imperative



LEXICON IA_INDEPENDENT    gives prefixes and flags for person-number in indicative



LEXICON IA_SUBJUNCTIV    gives prefixes and flags for person-number in subjunctive



LEXICON IA_IMPERATIV    gives prefixes and flags for person-number in imperative


Intransitive inanimate

These have no prefixes, so we go directly to the **IISTEM** lexicon.



Transitive animate

LEXICON TA   is still not written


Transitive inanimate

LEXICON TI   is still not written







# The suffixes





Intransitive animate (IA)

LEXICON IACONJ  splits in 3 conjugations

LEXICON IA_IND  gives positive and negative



LEXICON IA_IND_SUFF  (so far) gives present tense only


LEXICON IA_IND_PRS  gives person suffixes



LEXICON IA_SBJ  gives flag diacritics and directs to subjunctive person suffixes












LEXICON IA_IMP   gives flag diacritics and directs to imperative person suffixes






Intransitive inanimate (II)


LEXICON IICONJ   splits according to conjugation

LEXICON II_IND_PRS    is positive present

LEXICON II_NEG_IND_PRS   is negative present

LEXICON II_SBJ    is positive subjunctive

LEXICON II_NEG_SBJ    is negative subjunctive


Transitive animate (TA)

* LEXICON TACONJ_am   not yet written
* * *
<small>This (part of) documentation was generated from [../src/fst/affixes/verbs.lexc](http://github.com/giellalt/lang-ciw/blob/main/../src/fst/affixes/verbs.lexc)</small>
